Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 15
RELIEF OF RESIDENTIAL TAXPAYERS FROM
LIEN OF SPECIAL DISTRICT TAXES FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION INDEBTEDNESS

32-1-1501 to 32-1-1505. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part repealed, p. 993, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 15 was added in 1991 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 1992. For the text of this part 15 prior to 1992, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.